Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 1.1. General Provisions.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 2, effective April 6, 1995, provides: “That in keeping with the purposes of this act and to induce eligible state employees to voluntarily resign from employment with the Commonwealth, any full-time employee of the Commonwealth (i) whose position is covered by the Virginia Personnel Act (§ 2.1-110 et seq. [see now §

2.2-2900

et seq.] of the Code of Virginia), (ii) whose position is exempt from the Virginia Personnel Act pursuant to subdivision A 2, A 4 (except those persons specified in subsection C of § 2.1-116.22 [see now §

2.2-3202

] of the Code of Virginia), A 7, A 15 or A 16 of § 2.1-116 [see now §

2.2-2905

] of the Code of Virginia, (iii) who is employed by the State Corporation Commission, (iv) who is employed by the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission, (v) who is employed by the Virginia Retirement System, (vi) who is employed by the State Lottery Department, (vii) who is employed by the Medical College of Virginia Hospitals or the University of Virginia Medical Center, or (viii) who is employed at a state educational institution as administrative or professional faculty (but excluding presidents and teaching and research faculty) as defined in the Consolidated Salary Authorization for Faculty Positions in Institutions of Higher Education, 1994-95, may, subject to the conditions set forth in the fifth enactment of this act, elect to voluntarily resign and receive a severance benefit equivalent to (i) four weeks of salary if the employee has two years or less of consecutive service or (ii) two weeks of salary for each year of consecutive service, not to exceed thirty-six weeks of salary, if the employee has more than two years of consecutive service, together with the benefits conferred by subsection D of § 2.1-116.23 [see now §

2.2-3203

] of the Code of Virginia. Such employee shall also receive, in lieu of any unemployment compensation benefits to which the employee may be entitled, an amount, payable to the employee by the terminating agency on the employee’s date of termination, equal to the present value of the maximum unemployment compensation the employee would have received pursuant to Title 60.2 of the Code of Virginia had he been eligible for such benefits by virtue of the termination of his employment, not to exceed $5,000. The additional terms and conditions specified in § 2.1-116.23 [see now §

2.2-3203

] shall apply to those eligible state employees making such election and to the transitional severance benefit payable hereunder. Written application of an eligible employee’s election to participate in this incentive program shall be made to his employing agency no later than March 31, 1995. An eligible employee’s resignation pursuant to the program established by this enactment shall be effective May 1, 1995, unless an alternative date is authorized by the governing authority, as defined in the fifth enactment of this act, but in no event later than July 1, 1996.”

Acts 1995, c. 152, cl. 3, effective March 10, 1995 and Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 3, effective April 6, 1995, provide: “That in lieu of receiving a transitional severance benefit under the second enactment of this act, but in keeping with the purposes of this act and to induce eligible state employees to voluntarily retire from employment with the Commonwealth, any full-time employee of the Commonwealth (i) whose position is covered by the Virginia Personnel Act (§ 2.1-110 et seq. [see now §

2.2-3900

et seq.] of the Code of Virginia), (ii) whose position is exempt from the Virginia Personnel Act pursuant to subdivision A 2, A 4 (except those persons specified in subsection C of § 2.1-116.22 [see now §

2.2-3202

] of the Code of Virginia), A 7, A 15 or A 16 of § 2.1-116 [see now §

2.2-2905

] of the Code of Virginia, (iii) who is employeed by the State Corporation Commission, (iv) who is employed by the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission, (v) who is employed by the Virginia Retirement System, (vi) who is employed by the State Lottery Department, (vii) who is employed by the Medical College of Virginia Hospitals or the University of Virginia Medical Center, or (viii) who is employed at a state education institution as administrative or professional faculty (but excluding presidents and teaching and research faculty) as defined in the Consolidated Salary Authorization for Faculty Positions in Institutions of Higher Education, 1994-95, and who (a) is a vested member of the Virginia Retirement System and (b) is at least fifty years of age, may, subject to the conditions set forth in the fifth enactment of this act, elect to have the Commonwealth purchase on his behalf years to be credited to either his age or creditable service or a combination of age and creditable service, except that any years of credit purchased on behalf of a member of the Virginia Retirement System or the State Police Officers’ Retirement System who is eligible for unreduced retirement shall be added to his creditable service and not his age. The cost of each year of age or creditable service purchased by the Commonwealth shall be equal to fifteen percent of the employee’s present annual compensation. The number of years of age or creditable service to be purchased by the Commonwealth shall be equal to the quotient obtained by dividing (i) the cash value of the benefits to which the employee would be entitled under the second enactment of this act by (ii) the cost of each year of age or creditable service. The additional terms and conditions specified in § 2.1-116.24 [see now §

2.2-3204

] of the Code of Virginia shall apply to those eligible state employees making such election. Written notification of an eligible employee’s election to participate in this retirement incentive program shall be received by the Virginia Retirement System no later than March 3, 1995. An eligible employee’s retirement pursuant to the program established by this enactment shall be effective May 1, 1995, unless an alternative date is authorized by the governing authority, as defined in the fifth enactment of this act, but in no event later than July 1, 1996.”

Acts 1995, c. 152, cl. 11, effective March 10, 1995 and Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 11, effective April 6, 1995, provide: “That any employee of the Commonwealth who applied for retirement under the Virginia Retirement System (§

51.1-124.1

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) or the State Police Officers’ Retirement System (§

51.1-200

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) on or before December 1, 1994, shall not be eligible for the incentive programs established in the second or third enactments of this act, or for the benefits provided by Chapter 10.5 (§ 2.1-116.20 et seq.) [see now §

2.2-3200

et seq.] of the Code of Virginia.”

§ 51.1-124.1.
Legislative intent and purposes.

Article X, § 11 of the Constitution of Virginia requires the General Assembly to maintain a retirement system for state employees and employees of participating political subdivisions and school divisions, subject to restrictions and conditions prescribed by the General Assembly, that shall be administered in the best interests of the beneficiaries thereof. To that end and for the purposes of providing adequate benefits and pensions to members, encouraging stable employer contribution rates, and ensuring the overall soundness of the Retirement System, the General Assembly hereby establishes the Virginia Retirement System as an independent agency of the Commonwealth, exclusive of the legislative, executive, and judicial branches of government, in the following provisions.

History.

1994, c. 85; 2022, c. 294.

Editor’s note.

This section, relating to statement of intent and purpose, was enacted by Acts 1994, cc. 4 and 85. In furtherance of the general policy of the Virginia Code Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application, this section, which is limited in its purpose and scope, is not set out here, but attention is called to it by this reference.

The section catchline was inserted at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 294, in the first sentence, deleted “state employees’” preceding “retirement” and inserted “for state employees and employees of participating political subdivisions and school divisions” following “system”; and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Pursuant to this constitutional duty, the General Assembly hereby finds and declares that all present and future members of the Retirement System are entitled to a retirement system whose governing structure and institutional organization foster public confidence and trust in its investment practices, policy decisions, and administrative operations.”

§ 51.1-124.2.
Virginia Supplemental Retirement System continued as Virginia Retirement System.

The Virginia Supplemental Retirement System, a body corporate and a retirement system for teachers, state employees, and employees of participating political subdivisions, shall be continued as the Virginia Retirement System. Wherever the term
“Virginia Supplemental Retirement System”
appears in the Code of Virginia, it shall mean the Virginia Retirement System.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.11; 1960, c. 604; 1982, c. 478; 1990, c. 832, §

51.1-100

; 1994, cc. 4, 85.

Cross references.

As to annual audit of the system, see § 30-81.

As to health insurance credits for retired state employees, see §

51.1-1400

.

As to health insurance credits for retired teachers, see §

51.1-1401

.

Editor’s note.

House Joint Resolution No. 309, approved by the General Assembly in 1989, directed the Virginia Code Commission to undertake a revision of Title 51.1. The Commission’s report was published as House Document No. 52 of the 1990 Session and served as the basis for Title 51.1, which was enacted by Acts 1990, c. 832, effective July 1, 1990.

Acts 1990, c. 832, cl. 5 provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions, or contents of any section, article, or chapter of Title 51 or any other title of this Code as such titles existed prior to July 1, 1990, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section, article, or chapter of this title or any other title of this Code and whenever any such former section, article, or chapter is given a new number in this or any other title, all references to any such former section, article, or chapter of Title 51 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section, article, or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, or portions thereof.”

Acts 1990, c. 832, cl. 6 provides: “That the regulations of the Virginia Supplemental Retirement System in effect on the effective date of this act [July 1, 1990] shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations promulgated under this act.”

Acts 1990, c. 832, cl. 7 provides: “That this recodification of Title 51 as Title 51.1 shall not be construed to require the reappointment of any officer or any member of a board, council, committee, or other appointed body referred to in Title 51.1, and each such officer and member shall continue to serve the term for which appointed pursuant to the provisions of Title 51.”

Acts 2015, c. 669, cl. 1 provides: “That the Virginia Retirement System shall convene a work group to review current state and federal programs that encourage citizens of the Commonwealth to save for retirement by participating in retirement savings plans including, but not limited to, plans pursuant to §§ 401(k), 403(b), 408(k), 408(p), and 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. Such review shall include an examination of retirement savings options for self-employed individuals, part-time employees, full-time employees whose employers do not offer a retirement savings plan, and groups with a low savings rate. The membership of the work group shall include representatives of the Virginia Retirement System, the Department of Taxation, small business, the self-employed, the Virginia College Savings Plan, and other stakeholders. The findings may include recommendations for statutory changes or amendments to the general appropriation act. The Virginia Retirement System shall report the findings of the work group to the Governor and the General Assembly by January 1, 2017, as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports, and the report shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.”

§ 51.1-124.3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Abolished system”
means the Virginia Retirement Act, §§ 51-30 through 51-111, repealed by Chapter 1 of the Acts of Assembly of 1952.

“Accumulated contributions”
means the sum of all amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to his individual account in the member’s contribution account, all amounts the member may contribute to purchase creditable service, all member contributions contributed by the employer on behalf of the employee, on or after July 1, 1980, except those amounts contributed on behalf of members of the General Assembly who are otherwise retired under the provisions of this chapter, and all interest accruing to these funds. If a member is retired for disability from a cause which is compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.), dies in service prior to retirement, or requests a refund of contributions in accordance with §

51.1-161

, “accumulated contributions” shall include all member contributions paid by the employer on behalf of the member on and after July 1, 1980, and all interest which would have accrued to these funds.

“Actuarial equivalent”
means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of actuarial tables adopted by the Board.

“Average final compensation”
means the average annual creditable compensation of a member during his 60 highest consecutive months of creditable service or during the entire period of his creditable service if less than 60 months. However, for any member who (i) is not a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, and (ii) as of January 1, 2013, has at least 60 months of creditable service, “average final compensation” means the average annual creditable compensation of a member during his 36 highest consecutive months of creditable service. A participant in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

shall be considered to be a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, for the purposes of this definition.

If a member ceased employment prior to July 1, 1974, “average final compensation” means the average annual creditable compensation during the five highest consecutive years of creditable service.

“Beneficiary”
means any person entitled to receive benefits under this chapter.

“Board”
means the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System.

“Creditable compensation”
means the full compensation payable annually to an employee working full time in his covered position. For any state employee of a public institution of higher education or a teaching hospital affiliated with a public institution of higher education who is (i) compensated on a salaried basis and (ii) working full time in a covered position pursuant to a contract of employment for a period of at least nine months, creditable compensation means the full compensation payable over the term of any contract entered into between the employee and the employer, without regard to whether or not the term of the contract coincides with the normal scholastic year. However, if the contract is for more than one year, creditable compensation means that compensation paid for the current year of the contract.

Remuneration received by members of the General Assembly not otherwise retired under the provisions of this chapter pursuant to §§ 30-19.11 and 30-19.12 shall be deemed creditable compensation. In addition, for any member of the General Assembly, creditable compensation shall include the full amount of salaries payable to such member for working in covered positions, regardless of whether a contractual salary is reduced and not paid to such member because of service in the General Assembly.

“Creditable service”
means prior service as set forth in §

51.1-142.2

plus membership service for which credit is allowable.

“Employee”
means any teacher, state employee, officer, or employee of a locality participating in the Retirement System.

“Employer”
means the Commonwealth in the case of a state employee, the local public school board in the case of a teacher, or the political subdivision participating in the Retirement System.

“Joint Rules Committee”
means those members of the House of Delegates and the Senate designated by the Speaker of the House and the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Rules, respectively, to meet with each other and to act jointly on behalf of the Committee on Rules for each house.

“Local officer”
means the treasurer, commissioner of the revenue, attorney for the Commonwealth, clerk of a circuit court, or sheriff of any county or city, or deputy or employee of any such officer.

“Medical Board”
means the boards composed of physicians or other health care professionals as provided by this chapter.

“Member”
means any person included in the membership of the Retirement System.

“Membership service”
means service as an employee rendered while a contributing member of the Retirement System except as provided in this chapter.

“Normal retirement date”
means a member’s sixty-fifth birthday. However, for any (i) person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, or (ii) member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, under this chapter his normal retirement date shall be the date that the member attains his “retirement age” as defined under the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 416 et seq., as now or hereafter amended).

“Person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010,”
means a person who is not a member of a retirement plan administered by the Virginia Retirement System the first time he is hired on or after July 1, 2010, in a covered position. Subsequent separation from such position and subsequent employment in a covered position shall not alter the status of a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010.

“Political subdivision”
means any county, city, or town, any political entity, subdivision, branch, or unit of the Commonwealth, or any commission, public authority, or body corporate created by or under an act of the General Assembly specifying the powers, privileges, or authority capable of exercise by the commission, public authority, or body corporate.

“Prior service”
means service rendered prior to becoming a member of the Retirement System.

“Purchase of service contract”
means a contract entered into by the member and the Retirement System for the purchase of service credit by the member as provided in §

51.1-142.2

.

“Retirement allowance”
means the retirement payments to which a member is entitled.

“Retirement plan administered by the Virginia Retirement System”
means a retirement plan established under this title administered by the Virginia Retirement System, or by an agency that has been delegated administrative responsibility by the Virginia Retirement System, but such term shall exclude any plan established under Chapter 6 (§

51.1-600

et seq.) or Chapter 6.1 (§

58.1-607

et seq.).

“Retirement System”
means the Virginia Retirement System.

“Service”
means service as an employee.

“Social security disability benefit”
means, with respect to any member, the social security disability benefits to which the member is entitled pursuant to the provisions of the federal Social Security Act as in effect at his date of retirement.

“State employee”
means any person who is regularly employed full time on a salaried basis, whose tenure is not restricted as to temporary or provisional appointment, in the service of, and whose compensation is payable, no more often than biweekly, in whole or in part, by the Commonwealth or any department, institution, or agency thereof. “State employee” shall include any faculty member, but not including adjunct faculty, of a public institution of higher education (a) who is compensated on a salary basis, (b) whose tenure is not restricted as to temporary or provisional appointment, and (c) who regularly works at least 20 hours but less than 40 hours per week (or works the equivalent of one-half of a full time equivalent position) engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties at such institution; such faculty member shall be deemed an eligible employee for purposes of the retirement provisions under §§

51.1-126

,

51.1-126

.1, and

51.1-126.3

. “State employee” shall also include the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, and members of the General Assembly but shall not include (i) any local officer, (ii) any employee of a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, (iii) individuals employed by the Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired pursuant to §

51.5-72

, (iv) any member of the State Police Officers’ Retirement System, (v) any member of the Judicial Retirement System, or (vi) any member of the Virginia Law Officers’ Retirement System.

“Teacher”
means any person who is regularly employed full time on a salaried basis as a professional or clerical employee of a county, city, or other local public school board.

History.

1952, c. 157, §§ 51-111.10, 51-111.31; 1954, cc. 241, 497; 1956, c. 98; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 64; 1958, c. 367; 1960, cc. 400, 604; 1966, cc. 174, 175; 1970, c. 779; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 88, 185; 1972, cc. 568, 708; 1973, cc. 322, 523, 545, 546; 1974, cc. 353, 484; 1975, cc. 296, 597, 611; 1976, cc. 581, 678, 699; 1977, c. 620; 1980, c. 722, § 51-111.10:01; 1982, cc. 467, 478; 1984, c. 430; 1986, c. 474; 1987, c. 392; 1990, c. 832, § 51.1-101; 1992, cc. 811, 826; 1993, c. 895; 1994, cc. 4, 85, 876; 1996, cc. 711, 731; 1999, cc. 929, 974; 2000, c. 911; 2001, cc. 686, 697; 2003, c. 628; 2005, cc. 933, 945; 2007, c. 89; 2010, cc. 737, 738; 2012, cc. 701, 823; 2014, c. 356; 2018, cc. 53, 305; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 53, 54.

Cross references.

For enrollment in health care plan of a health care provider, notwithstanding the definition of state employee in this section, see §

51.1-502.1

.

As to health insurance credits for retired teachers, see §

51.1-1401

.

As to health insurance credits for retired constitutional officers, etc., see §

51.1-1403

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1991, c. 723, p. 5 provides that a secretary or administrative assistant of a member of the General Assembly regularly employed on a 12 consecutive month salary basis receiving state annual compensation of $10,000 or more pursuant to Paragraph A 5 of Item 1, may, for the purposes of former §§ 51-111.10 and 51-111.10:01, be deemed a “state employee” and as such will be eligible for participation in the Virginia Retirement System, the group life insurance plan and the state health insurance plan.

Acts 1993, c. 895, cl. 2, provides: “That remuneration received on and after January 1, 1990, pursuant to § 14.1-18.2 by a member of the General Assembly who on July 1, 1993, is a member of the General Assembly, shall be deemed creditable compensation.”

Acts 1995, c. 853, § 4-6.03, provides: “Notwithstanding §

51.1-124.3

, Code of Virginia, or any administrative ruling to the contrary, the definition of ‘state employee’ shall not be extended to any class of employees until July 1, 1996, unless specifically authorized by General Assembly action.”

Acts 1996, cc. 801 and 831, cls. 3, provide: “[t]hat, on the effective date of this act, any plan of conversion then pending before the State Corporation Commission shall not be approved by the Commission unless such plan provides for, or is amended to provide for, the appointment to the initial board of directors of the insurer’s parent company, for a term of three years each, one director from a list of three nominees submitted by the Joint Rules Committee, as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, and one director from a list of three nominees submitted by the Attorney General. Such nominees shall be citizens who do not hold public office and have no direct or indirect financial interest, except as a consumer, in the insurer.”

Acts 2001, cc. 686 and 697, cl. 3, provide: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect any contract for the purchase of service entered into between a member and the Virginia Retirement System before the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2001, cc. 686 and 697, cl. 4, provide: “That any rights granted under §§

51.1-142

,

51.1-142

.1 and

51.1-143

, as such rights existed in these sections immediately before the effective date of this act, and only to the extent that such rights conflict with the provisions of this act, shall remain in effect until July 1, 2002.”

Acts 2010, cc. 737 and 738, cl. 2 provides: “That the effective date of the initial determinations of the normal cost rates referred to in subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-142.2

of the Code of Virginia shall be January 1, 2011. Therefore, for a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, the applicable one-year period under subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-142.2

for purchasing service at the aforementioned normal cost rates shall begin no earlier than January 1, 2011.”

Acts 2010, cc. 737 and 738, cl. 3 provides: “That any person who prior to March 15, 2010, has entered into a written contract for employment in a covered position, for retirement purposes under Title 51.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall not be deemed to be a ‘person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010,’ as defined in §

51.1-124.3

of the Code of Virginia solely because the person commences employment pursuant to the contract on or after July 1, 2010.”

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 4-6.01 m 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, employees holding full-time, academic-year classified positions at public institutions of higher education shall be considered ‘state employees’ as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, Code of Virginia, and shall be considered for medical/hospitalization, retirement service credit, and other benefits on the same basis as those individuals appointed to full-time, 12-month classified positions.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 929 substituted “and 30-19.12” for “30-19.12 and 30-19.14” in the paragraph defining “Creditable compensation.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 974 added the last sentence in the paragraph defining “Creditable service.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 911, in the paragraph defining “State employee,” deleted “or” preceding the clause (v) designator and added “or (vi) any member of the Virginia Law Officers’ Retirement System.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 686 and 697 are identical, and in the paragraph defining “Creditable service,” inserted “as set forth in §

51.1-142.2

,” and deleted the former last sentence, which formerly read: “Creditable service may include sick leave credit accumulated as of the employee’s retirement date as certified by the employer to the Board as set forth in § 51.1-142.1”; and added the paragraph defining “Purchase of service contract.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 628 substituted “36” for “thirty-six” in the definition of “average final compensation”; and deleted the second sentence in the definition of “Creditable compensation,” which read: “In cases where compensation includes maintenance or other perquisites, the Board shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not paid in money.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 933 and 945 are identical, and in the definition of “Creditable compensation,” added the last two sentences; and inserted the next-to-last sentence in the definition of “State employee.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 89 substituted “July 1, 1980” for “July 1, 1990” in the first sentence of the paragraph defining “Accumulated contributions.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 737 and 738 are identical, and inserted the last sentence in the definition of “average final compensation”; inserted the last sentence in the definition of “normal retirement date”; and inserted the definitions of “person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010” and “retirement plan administered by the Virginia Retirement System.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 701 in the first paragraph of the definition of “Average final compensation,” substituted “60” for “36” twice in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “who as of January 1, 2013, has at least 60 months of creditable service, ‘average final compensation”’ for “who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, ‘average final compensation’,” substituted “36” for “60” and deleted “or during the entire period of his creditable service if less than 60 months” from the end thereof.

The 2012 amendment by c. 823 in the definition of “Average final compensation,” substituted “60” for “36” twice in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “member who (i) is not a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, and (ii) as of January 1, 2013, has at least 60 months of creditable service,” for “person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010,” and deleted “or during the entire period of his creditable service” at the end of the second sentence; and in the definition of “Normal retirement date,” inserted the clause (i) designation and “or (ii) member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 356 in the definition of “Average final compensation” added the last sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 53 and 305 are identical, and in the definition of “Medical Board,” substituted “boards composed of physicians or other health care professionals” for “board of physicians”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 53 and 54, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted the definition of “Primary social security benefit” and added the definition of “Social security disability benefit.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

21 M.J. Workers’ Compensation, § 8.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Employees of regional partnership are not eligible for Virginia Retirement System. —

Employees of a “regional partnership” formed pursuant to the Regional Competitiveness Act are not eligible for Virginia Retirement System coverage because a regional partnership is not a “political subdivision” under §

51.1-124.3

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia, 11-023, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 18 (3/18/11).

Discretion of employer in filing Form VRS-180. —

Statute allows for no discretion on the part of the employer once a final determination has been made that the felony arose from misconduct in a Virginia Retirement System covered position with the employer, despite discretionary language in an earlier version of the form. See opinion of Attorney General to Andrew R. McRoberts, Esquire, Essex County Attorney, No. 16-024, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/18/17).

§ 51.1-124.4.
Exemption of assets from taxation; exemption of benefits and assets from execution and assignment; trust funds; unclaimed property; eligible rollover distribution.

The assets of the retirement systems created under this title are hereby exempted from any state, county, or municipal tax. Retirement allowances and other benefits accrued or accruing to any person under this title and the assets of the retirement systems created under this title shall not be subject to execution, attachment, garnishment, or any other process whatsoever, except any process for a debt to any employer who has employed such person, and except for administrative actions pursuant to Chapter 19 (§

63.2-1900

et seq.) of Title 63.2 or any court process to enforce a child or child and spousal support obligation, nor shall any assignment thereof, other than a voluntary, irrevocable assignment of group life insurance pursuant to §

51.1-510

, be enforceable in any court. However, retirement benefits and assets created under this title which are deemed to be marital property pursuant to Chapter 6 (§

20-89.1

et seq.) of Title 20 may be divided or transferred by the court by direct assignment to a spouse or former spouse pursuant to §

20-107.3

. The assets of the retirement systems administered by the Board are trust funds and shall be used solely for the benefit of members and beneficiaries and to administer the retirement systems. The Board shall establish procedures whereby persons entitled to property held by the Board, which would be presumed abandoned under the Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.), may recover it.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary that would otherwise limit a distributee’s election, a distributee may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Board, to have any portion of an eligible rollover distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee in a direct rollover. The terms “eligible rollover distribution,” “eligible retirement plan” and “distributee” have the meanings prescribed by § 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code (including as such section is amended or renumbered, or any successor provision thereto) and the regulations thereunder, as may be amended. Such terms shall include non-spouse designated beneficiaries and inherited individual retirement accounts in accordance with § 402(c)(11) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended or renumbered, and the regulations thereunder applicable to governmental plans. In the event of a mandatory cash-out, as that term is defined under the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder applicable to governmental plans, greater than $1,000, if the member does not elect to have such distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the member in a direct rollover or to receive the distribution directly in accordance with this section, then the Board shall pay the distribution in a direct rollover to an individual retirement plan designated by the Board in accordance with subsection F of §

51.1-124.30

.

The provisions of this chapter and Chapters 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.) and 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) are intended to meet the requirements of § 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended or renumbered, and the regulations thereunder applicable to governmental plans.

History.

1952, c. 157, §§ 51-111.15, 51-111.24; 1954, c. 633; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 47; 1962, c. 50; 1972, c. 151; 1973, c. 523; 1976, c. 545; 1977, c. 620; 1978, c. 841; 1980, cc. 559, 596; 1983, c. 308, § 51-111.26:1; 1984, c. 430; 1986, c. 474; 1989, Sp. Sess., c. 3; 1990, c. 832, § 51.1-102; 1991, c. 433; 1992, cc. 716, 811; 1993, c. 135; 1994, cc. 4, 85, 883; 2003, c. 15; 2006, c. 637; 2015, c. 660.

Cross references.

As to borrowing by county school boards from the Virginia Retirement System, see §§ 22.1-161.1 through 22.1-161.8 and Va. Const., Art. VII, § 10.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.)” for “Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§ 55-210.1 et seq.).”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 15 rewrote subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 637, in subsection B, inserted “(including as such section is amended or renumbered or any successor provision thereto)” in the second sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 660 inserted the third sentence in subsection B and added subsection C.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (2006).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18 Enforcement of Judgments and decrees. § 18.02 Exemptions from Execution. Bryson.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2A The Elective Share. § 2A.04 The Augmented Estate, etc. Cox.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Pensions, § 2; 16 M.J. Setoff, Recoupment and Counterclaim, § 22.

§ 51.1-124.5.
Disclosure of social security account numbers.

The Retirement System may require the disclosure of the social security account number of any employee, judge, or other person covered under this title to be used for any purpose relating to the administration of the retirement systems or the implementation of this title.

History.

1977, c. 620, § 51-111.22:2; 1990, c. 832, § 51.1-103; 1994, cc. 4, 85.

§ 51.1-124.6.
Benefits to be paid monthly.

All benefits payable by the Retirement System shall be paid in equal monthly installments, unless the Board approves another method of payment.

History.

1952, c. 353, § 51-111.71; 1990, c. 832, § 51.1-104; 1994, cc. 4, 85.